Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-706
Preservation of interest in loaned property; notice; contents.

(1) A notice of intent to preserve an interest in property on loan to a museum filed pursuant to the Museum Property Act shall be in writing and contain all of the following information:

(a) A description of the property adequate to enable the museum to identify the property;

(b) Documentation sufficient to establish the claimant as owner of the property or a holder of a security interest in the property;

(c) A statement attesting to the truth, to the best of the signer's knowledge, of all information included in or with the notice; and

(d) The signature, under penalty of perjury, of the claimant or a person authorized to act on behalf of the claimant.

(2) The museum need not retain a notice which does not meet the requirements set forth in subsection (1) of this section. If the museum does not intend to retain a notice for this reason, the museum shall promptly notify the claimant at the address given on the notice that the museum believes the notice is ineffective to preserve an interest and the reasons for the insufficiency. The fact that a museum retains a notice under section 51-710 does not mean that the museum accepts the sufficiency or accuracy of the notice or that the notice is effective to preserve an interest in property on loan to the museum.

Laws 1996, LB 1276, § 6.